Montana, session 2025, SB440.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Report of STATEWIDE CANVASSED election results -- rulemaking. (1) For an election
subject to a statewide canvass as provided in part 5 of this chapter, after the vote count procedures provided in
13-15-101 are completed and before the canvass required in 13-15-401 begins, the secretary of state shall
design a reconciliation spreadsheet for the county election administrator shall prepare a administrators, who
shall then use the spreadsheet with to provide the following information:
(a) the total number of registered electors in the county;
(b) the total number of ballots issued by type, including poll, absentee, provisional, and military-
overseas;
(c) the total number of votes cast by type, including poll, absentee, provisional, and military-
overseas;
(d) the total number of ballots accepted by type, including poll, absentee, provisional, and military-
overseas;
(e) the total number of ballots rejected by type, including poll, absentee, provisional, and military-
overseas;
(f) the total number of test ballots printed, counted, and accepted; and used for testing, and
counted;
(g) the total number of electors who registered on election day; and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 440
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 440
(h) precinct-level information including:
(i) the total number of registered voters in the precinct; and
(ii) the total number of ballots counted in the precinct by type, including poll, absentee, provisional,
and military-overseas; and
(iii) the total number of test ballots printed, counted, and accepted.
(2) The spreadsheet must be posted to the county election website in a place accessible by all
members of the public no later than when the board of county canvassers meets as provided in 13-15-401.
(3) A digital copy of the spreadsheet must be retained in perpetuity. A physical copy of the
spreadsheet must be retained with all other records for that election in accordance with the retention schedule
provided in 13-1-303.
(4) (a) The spreadsheet data must be submitted county election administrator shall submit the
spreadsheet to the secretary of state prior to the certification of the election no later than when the board of
county canvassers meets as provided in 13-15-401.
(b) The secretary of state shall use the data submitted by the counties to prepare a comprehensive
reconciliation report prior to the certification of the election at least 7 days prior to the certification of the election
results by the board of state canvassers.
(c) If, in the process of preparing the comprehensive reconciliation report, the secretary of state
discovers discrepancies within a county's results, the secretary of state shall immediately refer the matter to
legislative leadership address it with the county election administrator, the county governing body, and
legislative leadership for the purpose of correcting errors and reconciling discrepancies by whatever action is
deemed appropriate.
(d) If notified of discrepancies in a county's results, legislative leadership may convene the
legislative audit committee to investigate the matter.
(5) As soon as the report required in subsection (4) is available, the secretary of state shall:
(a) submit the report to the legislative services division, in accordance with 5-11-210, for
distribution to all members of the legislature;
(b) post the report to the statewide election website in a place accessible by all members of the
public; and
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 440
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 440
(c) present the report to the state administration and veterans' affairs interim committee at the first
meeting after a statewide or federal primary or general election.
(6) The secretary of state may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
13, chapter 15, part 1, and the provisions of Title 13, chapter 15, part 1, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 440
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 440, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 440
INTRODUCED BY T. MANZELLA
AN ACT REQUIRING PUBLIC REPORTS OF STATEWIDE CANVASSED ELECTION RESULTS PROVIDED
UNDER TITLE 13, CHAPTER 15, PART 5; PROVIDING THE INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE
REPORT; AND ESTABLISHING REPORTING REQUIREMENTS; AND PROVIDING RULEMAKING
AUTHORITY.”